Utah statutes.
53-8-303.   Utah Highway Patrol Aero Bureau Restricted Account.

(1)  As used in this section, "account" means the Utah Highway Patrol Aero Bureau Restricted Account created by this section.

(2)  There is created a restricted account in the General Fund known as the "Utah Highway Patrol Aero Bureau Restricted Account."

(3)  The account shall consist of:

(a)  money deposited into the account in accordance with Section 41-22-19;

(b)  money appropriated to the account by the Legislature; and

(c)  any other public or private money received by the division that is:

(i)  given to the division for purposes consistent with this section; and

(ii)  deposited into the account at the request of:

(A)  the division; or

(B)  the person giving the money.

(4)  Money in the account may only be expended for:

(a)  the purchase of aircraft and helicopters for use by the Aero Bureau in search and rescue operations;

(b)  replacement, maintenance, and upgrade of search and rescue equipment;

(c)  search and rescue training and certification for division officers and employees;

(d)  personnel and fuel costs of the Aero Bureau associated with providing search and rescue services; and

(e)  any other equipment or expenses necessary or appropriate for conducting search and rescue activities.



Enacted by Chapter 71, 2012 General Session

